Missouri, session 2025S2, HJR1.
Be it enacted by the
people of the state of Missouri:".
Section 52(b). The veto power of the governor shall not extend to measures referred
tothepeople. Allelectionsonmeasuresreferredtothepeopleshallbehadatthegeneralstate
elections, except when the general assembly shall order a special election. Any measure
referredtothepeoplebythegeneralassemblyshalltakeeffectwhenapprovedbyamajority
of the votes cast thereon, and not otherwise. Notwithstanding Article XII, Section 2(b) of
this constitution, any constitutional measure proposed by the initiative shall take effect
attheendof thirtydays after theelectionif approvedby anumberofvotes greaterthan
or equal to a majority of the registered voters in the state, and not otherwise. For the
purposes of this section, the number of registered voters shall be determined by the
number of registered voters entitled to vote at the general, municipal, or primary
election, whichever is most recent, immediately preceding the election at which the
proposed constitutional amendment is to appear on the ballot. This section shall not be
construed to deprive any member of the general assembly of the right to introduce any
measure.
SectionB. Pursuant tochapter116,andother applicableconstitutionalprovisionsand
lawsofthisstateallowingthegeneralassemblytoadoptballotlanguageforthesubmissionof
this joint resolution to the voters of this state, the official summary statement of this
resolution shall be as follows:
"Shall the Missouri Constitution be amended to:
• Limit voting on initiative petitions to United States citizens;
• Reduce the number of signatures needed to place a proposed constitutional
amendment on the ballot by initiative petition; and
• Require a majority of Missouri registered voters to amend the constitution by
initiative petition?".
✔